ja: スチームノズルの種類: 角度; ブラシ; クリアランス; ディテール; 引張コイルばね; フロア; ジェット; ラウンド; スクレーパー; 窓用スキージー; その他
es: Tipo de boquilla de vapor: Ángulo; Pincel; Hendedura; Detalle; Extensión; Suelo; Jet; Redondo; Raspador; Limpiacristales; Otros
ro-RO: Tip de duză pentru abur: Angular; Perie; Crăpătură; Detaliu; Prelungire; De podea; Jet; Rotund; Răzuitoare; Racletă de ferestre; Altele
de: Düsentyp für Dampfreiniger: Winkel; Bürste; Spalt; Detail; Verlängerung; Boden; Strahl; Kreis; Schaber; Fensterabzieher; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 蒸氣噴嘴類型: 角度; 刷子; 縫隙; 詳細資訊; 延長; 地板; 噴嘴; 圓頭; 刮刀; 窗戶刮水器; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta parne mlaznice: Kutni; Četka; Pukotina; Detail; Produžetak; Podni; Mlaznica; Okrugla; Strugač; Brisač za prozore; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ trysky postrekovača: Uhlová; Kefa; Štrbinový; Detail; Rozšírenie; Podlahová; Tryska; Okrúhla; Škrabka; Stierka na okná; Iné
en: Steam nozzle type: Angle; Brush; Crevice; Detail; Extension; Floor; Jet; Round; Scraper; Window squeegee; Other
fi: Höyrysuuttimen tyyppi: Kulma; Sivellin; Rako; Yksityiskohdat; Laajennettu; Lattia; Suihku; Pyöreä; Kaavin; Ikkunanpesuri; Muu
zh-CN: 蒸汽喷嘴类型: 弯角型; 毛刷型; 缝隙清洁嘴; 细节型; 延长型; 地板型; 喷射型; 圆形; 刮刀型; 窗户刮水器; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta parne šobe: Angle; Čopič; Razpoka; Detail; Podaljšana; Talni; Curek; Okrogel; Strgalo; Okenska strgala; Druga
tr: Buhar nozulu tipi: Açılı; Fırça; Dar uçlu başlık; Detay; Uzatma; Zemin; Jet; Yuvarlak; Kazıyıcı; Cam sileceği; Diğer
sv: Typ av ångmunstycke: Vinkel; Borste; Skreva; Detalj; Förlängning; Golv; Jet; Rund; Skrapa; Fönsterskrapa; Annat
cs: Typ parní trysky: Úhlové; Kartáčové; Štěrbina; Bodové; Prodlužovací; Podlahové; Proudové; Kruhové; Škrabkové; Stěrka na okna; Jiné
it: Tipo di ugello per vapore: Angolo; Pennello; Crepaccio; Dettaglio; Estensibile; Pavimento; A getto; Rotondo; Raschietto; Tergivetro; Altro
pl: Typ dyszy parowej: Kątowe; Szczotkowe; Dysza szczelinowa; Precyzyjne; Przedłużka; Podłogowe; Strumieniowe; Okrągłe; Skrobak; Ściągaczka do okien; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de bico de vapor: Ângulo; Pincel; Fenda; Detalhe; Extensão; Piso; Jato; Redondo; Raspador; Rodo para janela; Outro
da: Dampdysetype: Vinkel; Børste; Sprække; Detaljer; Udvidelse; Gulv; Jet; Rund; Skraber; Vinduesskraper; Andet
el: Τύπος ακροφυσίου ατμού: Γωνιακό; Βούρτσα; Ρωγμή; Λεπτομερειών; Προέκταση; Δαπέδου; Πίδακα; Στρογγυλό; Ξύστρα; Σκουπίδι παραθύρων; Άλλο
nl: Type stoommondstuk: Hoek; Borstel; Kierenzuiger; Productgegevens; Verlengbaar; Vloer; Jet; Rond; Schraper; Raamwisser; Overig
bg-BG: Тип дюза за пара: Ъгъл; Четка; Широка цепка; Детайл; Удължение; Под; Струйна; Кръгло; Тип „стъргалка“; Гумена стъклочистачка; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de bocal para dispositivo de vapor: Ângulo; Pincel; Fenda; Detalhe; Extensão; Chão; Jato; Redondo; Raspador; Rodo de janela; Outro
ko: 스팀 노즐 유형: 각도; 브러시; 틈새; 세부 정보; 연장; 바닥; 제트; 라운드; 스크레이퍼; 창문 닦이; 기타
vi: Loại đầu vòi phun hơi nước: Đầu vát; Cọ; Khe hở; Chi tiết; Nối dài; Sàn nhà; Tia; Tròn; Dụng cụ cạo; Cây gạt nước cửa sổ; Khác
lt-LT: Garo antgalio tipas: Kampas; Šepetėlis; Plyšys; Detalė; Ilginamasis; Grindims; Su purškikliu; Apvalus; Grandiklis; Langų valytuvas; Kita
nb: Dampdysetype: Vinkel; Børste; Sprekk; Detalj; Forlengelse; Gulv; Jet; Rund; Skrape; Vindusskrape; Annet
ru: Тип паровой насадки: Угловая; Щетка; Щелевая; Точечная; Удлинительная; Половая; Струйная; Круглая; Скребок; Скребок для окон; Другая
fr: Type de buse vapeur: Angle; Brosse; Fente; Détail; Extension; Sol; Jet; Rond; Grattoir; Raclette de fenêtre; Autre
hu: Gőzfúvóka típusa: Szögletes; Ecset; Résfúvóka; Pontsugaras; Hosszabbító; Padló; Sugaras; Kerek; Kaparó; Ablaktisztító; Egyéb
th: ประเภทหัวฉีดไอน้ำ: มุม; แปรง; รอยแยก; รายละเอียด; ต่อความยาว; พื้น; เจ็ท; ทรงกลม; ที่ขูด; ที่เช็ดกระจก; อื่นๆ